old_src/pron-kal-lex.txt
LEXICON DivPron2	!(kisi)
+DivPron+U+nv:%>miu	IV_voq ;
+DivPron+Abs+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+2Sg:%>vit	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+3Sg:%>at	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+1Pl:%>tta	K ; 
+DivPron+Abs+2Pl:%>ssi	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+3Pl:%>isa	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+2Sg:%>vit	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+3Sg:%>at	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+1Pl:%>tta	K ; 
+DivPron+Rel+2Pl:%>ssi	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+3Pl:%>isa	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>anut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnut	TrmVb ; 
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>annut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>anit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnit	AblVb ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>annit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>miniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinniit	K ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>anniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>ani	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mini	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>anni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>anik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnik	K ; 
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+3PlPoss:%>annik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnik	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>kkut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>kkut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>agut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+3SgPoss:%>atigut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>migut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsigut	K ; 
+DivPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssigut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>atigut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>asigut	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mikkut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ttut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>ttut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>atut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>misut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsitut	K ; 
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssitut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:%>attut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>mittut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>missut	K ;

LEXICON DivPronNNGUAQ	!(tamaq+NNGUAQ)
+DivPron+Abs+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+2Sg:%>%TRUNCppit	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
+DivPron+Abs+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+3Pl:%>%VTRUNCisa	K ;
+DivPron+Abs+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+2Sg:%>%TRUNCppit	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
+DivPron+Rel+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+3Pl:%>%VTRUNCisa	K ;
+DivPron+Rel+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut	TrmVb ; 
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit	AblVb ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit	K ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnik	K ; 
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnik	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsigut	ViaVb ; 
+DivPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssigut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCatigut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCagut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mikkut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsitut	K ; 
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssitut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCattut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mittut	K ;

LEXICON DivPron3	!(tamaq)
+DivPron+Lok:%>%TRUNCni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Abl:%>%TRUNCnit	AblVb ;
+DivPron+Trm:%>%TRUNCnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Ins:%>%TRUNCnik	K ;
+DivPron+Via:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Aeq:%>%TRUNCtut	K ;

!LEXICON DivPron4	!(tamaq, iluunngaq, katinngaq, toqunngaq, attaq, kiserluinnaq, tamarluinnaq, iluunngarluinnaq, kisivik, kisingajak, tamangajak)
!+DivPron+Abs+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+2Sg:%>pit	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+3Sg:%>%TRUNCat	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abs+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+3Pl:%>%TRUNCisa	K ;
!+DivPron+Abs+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+2Sg:%>pit	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+3Sg:%>%TRUNCat	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
!+DivPron+Rel+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+3Pl:%>%TRUNCisa	K ;
!+DivPron+Rel+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut	TrmVb ; 
!+DivPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnut	TrmVb ;
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit	AblVb ;  
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnit	AblVb ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>miniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit	K ;  
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minniit	K ; 
!+DivPron+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCani	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mini	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minni	LokVb ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnik	K ; 
!+DivPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannik	K ;
!+DivPron+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnik	K ;
!+DivPron+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCagut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCatigut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>migut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsigut	ViaVb ; 
!+DivPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssigut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCatigut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCagut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mikkut	ViaVb ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCatut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>misut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsitut	K ; 
!+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssitut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCattut	K ;
!+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mittut	K ;

LEXICON DivPron4	!(tamaq, iluunngaq, katinngaq, toqunngaq, attaq, kiserluinnaq, tamarluinnaq, iluunngarluinnaq, kisivik, kisingajak, tamangajak) - NY version testet 19.8.2012. Konsekvensrettelser i multichar def i kal-lex.txt og i kal-dis.rle
+DivPron+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+2Sg:%>pit	K ;
+DivPron+Akk+3Sg:%>%TRUNCat	K ;
+DivPron+Nom+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
+DivPron+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
+DivPron+Akk+3Pl:%>%TRUNCisa	K ;
+DivPron+Nom+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+1Sg:%>ma	K ;
+DivPron+2Sg:%>pit	K ;
+DivPron+Akk+3Sg:%>%TRUNCat	K ;
+DivPron+Nom+4Sg:%>mi	K ;
+DivPron+1Pl:%>%TRUNCtta	K ; 
+DivPronl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCssi	K ;
+DivPron+Akk+3Pl:%>%TRUNCisa	K ;
+DivPron+Nom+4Pl:%>mik	K ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut	TrmVb ; 
+DivPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut	TrmVb ;
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit	AblVb ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit	AblVb ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit	K ;  
+DivPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit	K ; 
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinni	LokVb ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	K ;
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnik	K ; 
+DivPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnik	K ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsigut	ViaVb ; 
+DivPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssigut	ViaVb ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	K ;
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsitut	K ; 
+DivPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssitut	K ;
